Wisconsin, session 2025, SB559.
do enact as follows:SB559,11Section 1. 66.0401 (1e) (bd) of the statutes is created to read:SB559,2,3266.0401 (1e) (bd) “Community solar facility” has the meaning given in s. 3196.376 (1) (b).SB559,24Section 2. 66.0401 (1e) (bm) of the statutes is created to read:SB559,2,5566.0401 (1e) (bm) “Municipality” means a city, village, or town.SB559,36Section 3. 66.0401 (1m) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB559,2,13766.0401 (1m) Authority to restrict systems limited. (intro.) No political 8subdivision may place any restriction, either directly or in effect, on the installation 9or use of a wind energy system that is more restrictive than the rules promulgated 10by the commission under s. 196.378 (4g) (b). No Except as provided in sub. (1s), no 11political subdivision may place any restriction, either directly or in effect, on the 12installation or use of a solar energy system, as defined in s. 13.48 (2) (h) 1. g., or a 13wind energy system, unless the restriction satisfies one of the following conditions:SB559,414Section 4. 66.0401 (1s) of the statutes is created to read:SB559,2,221566.0401 (1s) Regulation of community solar facilities. (a) 16Notwithstanding ss. 60.61, 60.62, 61.35, and 62.23 (7), no building permit for a 17structure that is part of a community solar facility may be issued unless the 18municipality with zoning authority over the parcels on which the community solar 19facility is to be located approves the use of those parcels for purposes of a 20community solar facility by a two-thirds vote of the governing body of the 21municipality. This paragraph does not apply under any of the following 22circumstances:SB559,3,211. In a town that has not enacted a zoning ordinance under ss. 60.62 and 261.35.SB559,3,532. If use as a community solar facility is a permitted use for which no 4additional discretionary approval is required for all parcels in the municipality to 5be used as part of the community solar facility.SB559,3,76(b) Community solar facilities are subject to any zoning ordinance applicable 7to the parcel on which the community solar facility is located.SB559,58Section 5. 76.28 (1) (e) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB559,3,17976.28 (1) (e) (intro.) “Light, heat and power companies” means any person, 10association, company or corporation, including corporations described in s. 66.0813, 11qualified wholesale electric companies and transmission companies and except only 12business enterprises carried on exclusively either for the private use of the person, 13association, company or corporation engaged in them, or for the private use of a 14person, association, company or corporation owning a majority of all outstanding 15capital stock or who control the operation of business enterprises and except 16electric cooperatives taxed under s. 76.48 and subscriber organizations, as defined 17in s. 196.376 (1) (i), that engage in any of the following businesses:SB559,618Section 6. 196.01 (5) (b) 9. of the statutes is created to read:SB559,3,2119196.01 (5) (b) 9. A subscriber organization, as defined in s. 196.376 (1) (i), if, 20besides owning or operating a community solar facility, the subscriber organization 21does not otherwise directly or indirectly provide electricity to the public.SB559,722Section 7. 196.376 of the statutes is created to read:SB559,3,2323196.376 Community solar programs. (1) Definitions. In this section:SB559,4,31(a) “Bill credit” means the kilowatt-hours generated by the community solar 2facility allocated to a subscriber to offset the kilowatt-hour usage on the 3subscriber’s electricity bill.SB559,4,74(b) “Community solar facility” means a facility that generates electricity by 5means of a solar photovoltaic device and that produces for its subscribers a bill 6credit for the electricity generated in proportion to the size of their subscription, 7and to which all of the following apply:SB559,4,1081. The facility is located on one or more parcels of land and no other 9community solar facility under the control of the same entity, an affiliated entity, or 10an entity under common control is located on that land.SB559,4,16112. At the time the subscriber organization that owns or operates the facility 12executes an interconnection agreement with the investor-owned electric utility 13serving the territory where the facility is located, the facility is not located within 14one mile, measured from the point of interconnection, of a solar facility under the 15control of the same entity unless the other solar facility is located on a rooftop or 16previously developed site.SB559,4,17173. The facility has at least 3 subscribers.SB559,4,18184. Either of the following applies:SB559,4,2019a. The facility generates not more than 5 megawatts alternating current of 20electricity.SB559,4,2221b. If the facility is located on a rooftop or previously developed site, the facility 22generates not more than 20 megawatts alternating current of electricity.SB559,5,4235. If the facility is located on a rooftop or previously developed site, the total 24electricity generated by the facility and all other facilities located on a rooftop or 1previously developed site that are located within one mile of the facility, measured 2from the point of interconnection, and that are under the control of the same entity, 3an affiliated entity, or an entity under common control does not exceed 20 4megawatts alternating current of electricity.SB559,5,656. No subscriber holds more than a 40 percent interest in the output of the 6facility.SB559,5,877. Not less than 60 percent of the capacity of the facility is subscribed to by 8subscriptions of not more than 40 kilowatts.SB559,5,109(c) “Control” means the possession, direct or indirect, of the power to direct 10the management and policies of an entity through any method.SB559,5,1311(d) “Investor-owned electric utility” means a public utility that sells electricity 12at retail but does not include a public utility owned and operated by city, village, or 13town.SB559,5,1514(e) “Non-ministerial permit” means a permit or approval necessary to 15construct a community solar facility that is not granted based on discretion.SB559,5,2116(f) “Previously developed site” means a property, including any related buffer 17areas, that has been previously disturbed or developed for non-single-family 18residential, nonagricultural, or nonsilvicultural use regardless of whether the 19property is currently being used for any purpose. “Previously developed site” 20includes brownfields and parcels that have been previously used for any of the 21following:SB559,5,22221. A retail, commercial, or industrial purpose.SB559,5,23232. A parking lot.SB559,5,24243. A site of a parking lot canopy or structure.SB559,6,114. Mining.SB559,6,225. Quarrying.SB559,6,336. A landfill.SB559,6,54(g) “Renewable energy credit” means a tradable credit that represents one 5megawatt hour of electricity produced from a renewable resource.SB559,6,76(h) “Subscriber” means a retail electric customer of an investor-owned electric 7utility who satisfies all of the following:SB559,6,981. The subscriber owns one or more subscriptions to a community solar 9facility interconnected with the investor-owned electric utility.SB559,6,11102. The subscriber is located within the service territory of the investor-owned 11electric utility where the community solar facility is located. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb559 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb559 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB559 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB559 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB559: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting